Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-734
District; chairperson, clerk, administrator; bond; premium.

The chairperson and clerk or administrator of any such district shall, upon assuming his or her respective office, execute and file with the county clerk of the county in which such district, or the greater portion of the area thereof, is located, a bond, with one or more sureties, to be approved by the county clerk, running to the State of Nebraska in the penal sum of five thousand dollars for the chairperson, twenty thousand dollars for the clerk, and twenty thousand dollars for the administrator, conditioned for the faithful performance of their official duties and the faithful accounting by them for all funds and property of the district that shall come into their possession or control during their term of office. The premium, if any, on any such bond shall be paid out of the funds of the district. Suit may be brought on such bonds by any person, firm, or corporation that has sustained loss or damage in consequence of the breach thereof.

Laws 1949, c. 78, § 8, p. 198;

Laws 1976, LB 313, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 252, § 2;

Laws 1982, LB 868, § 4.